North Carolina, session 2025, SB43.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 20-183.3(a) reads as rewritten:
"§ 20-183.3. Scope of safety inspection and emissions inspection.
(a) Safety. – A safety inspection of a motor vehicle consists of an inspection of the
following equipment to determine if the vehicle has the equipment required by Part 9 of Article
3 of this Chapter and if the equipment is in a safe operating condition:
…
(5) Windows and windshield wipers, as required by G.S. 20-127. To determine if
a vehicle window meets the window tinting restrictions, a safety inspection
mechanic must first determine, based on use of an automotive film check card
or knowledge of window tinting techniques, if after-factory tint has been
applied to the window. If after-factory tint has been applied, the mechanic
must use a light meter approved by the Commissioner to determine if the
window meets the window tinting restrictions.Windshield wipers, as required
by G.S. 20-127(a).
…."
SECTION 2. G.S. 20-183.7(a) reads as rewritten:
"§ 20-183.7. Fees for performing an inspection and issuing an electronic inspection
authorization to a vehicle; use of civil penalties.
(a) Fee Amount. – When a fee applies to an inspection of a vehicle or the issuance of an
electronic inspection authorization, the fee must be collected. The following fees apply to an
inspection of a vehicle and the issuance of an electronic inspection authorization:
Type Inspection Authorization
Safety Only $12.75 $ .85
Emissions and Safety 23.75 6.25.
The fee for performing an inspection of a vehicle applies when an inspection is performed,
regardless of whether the vehicle passes the inspection. The fee for an electronic inspection
authorization applies when an electronic inspection authorization is issued to a vehicle. The fee
for inspecting after-factory tinted windows shall be ten dollars ($10.00), and the fee applies only
to an inspection performed with a light meter after a safety inspection mechanic determined that
the window had after-factory tint. A safety inspection mechanic shall not inspect an after-factory
*S43-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
tinted window of a vehicle for which the Division has issued a medical exception permit pursuant
to G.S. 20-127(f).
A vehicle that is inspected at an inspection station and fails the inspection is entitled to be
reinspected at the same station at any time within 60 days of the failed inspection without paying
another inspection fee.
The inspection fee for an emissions and safety inspection set out in this subsection is the
maximum amount that an inspection station or an inspection mechanic may charge for an
emissions and safety inspection of a vehicle. An inspection station or an inspection mechanic
may charge the maximum amount or any lesser amount for an emissions and safety inspection
of a vehicle. The inspection fee for a safety only inspection set out in this subsection may not be
increased or decreased. The authorization fees set out in this subsection may not be increased or
decreased."
SECTION 3. G.S. 20-127 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(g) The driver of a vehicle with tinted windows shall roll down the driver side window
upon the approach of a law enforcement officer. If the officer approaches from the passenger
side, the driver shall roll down the passenger window."
SECTION 4. This act becomes effective December 1, 2025, and applies to offenses
committed on or after that date.
Page 2 Senate Bill 43-First Edition